Tennessee, session 114, SB0178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-112, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting the following:
(a) A governing body shall, for each public meeting, reserve a period for public
comment to provide the public with the opportunity to comment:
(1) On matters that are germane to the items on the agenda for the
meeting; and
(2) On any matter that is germane to the jurisdiction of the governing
body, regardless of whether such matter is an item on the agenda for the
meeting.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0178
000484
- 1 -